Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.150

Termination of membership—Restoration of service credit.

Should any member die, or should the individual separate or be separated from service without leave of absence before attaining age sixty years, or should the individual become a beneficiary, except a beneficiary of an optional retirement allowance as provided by RCW 41.40.188, the individual shall thereupon cease to be a member except;

(1) As provided in RCW 41.40.170.

(2) An employee not previously retired who reenters service shall upon completion of six months of continuous service and upon the restoration, in one lump sum or in annual installments, of all withdrawn contributions: (a) With interest as computed by the director, which restoration must be completed within a total period of five years of membership service following the member's first resumption of employment or (b) paying the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2), be returned to the status, either as an original member or new member which the member held at time of separation.

(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a member who separates or has separated after having completed at least five years of service shall remain a member during the period of absence from service for the exclusive purpose of receiving a retirement allowance to begin at attainment of age sixty-five, however, such a member may on written notice to the director elect to receive a reduced retirement allowance on or after age sixty which allowance shall be the actuarial equivalent of the sum necessary to pay regular retirement benefits as of age sixty-five: PROVIDED, That if such member should withdraw all or part of the member's accumulated contributions except those additional contributions made pursuant to RCW 41.40.330(2), the individual shall thereupon cease to be a member and this section shall not apply.

(b) A member who:

(i) Separates from service under this subsection on or after January 1, 2002; and

(ii) Attains the age of fifty with at least twenty years of service prior to separation; and

(iii) Is not retired as of June 13, 2002, shall remain a member during the period of absence from service for the exclusive purpose of receiving a retirement allowance to begin at attainment of age sixty.

If such a member should withdraw all or part of the member's accumulated contributions except those additional contributions made pursuant to RCW 41.40.330(2), the individual shall thereupon cease to be a member and this section shall not apply.

(4) The recipient of a retirement allowance elected to office or appointed to office directly by the governor, and who shall apply for and be accepted in membership as provided in RCW 41.40.023(3) shall be considered to have terminated his or her retirement status and shall become a member of the retirement system with the status of membership the member held as of the date of retirement. Retirement benefits shall be suspended from the date of return to membership until the date when the member again retires and the member shall make contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again retire if eligible in accordance with RCW 41.40.180: PROVIDED, That where any such right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has rendered six uninterrupted months of service the type of retirement allowance the member had at the time of the member's previous retirement shall be reinstated, but no additional service credit shall be allowed: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That if such a recipient of a retirement allowance does not elect to apply for reentry into membership as provided in RCW 41.40.023(3), the member shall be considered to remain in a retirement status and the individual's retirement benefits shall continue without interruption.

(5) Any member who leaves the employment of an employer and enters the employ of a public agency or agencies of the state of Washington, other than those within the jurisdiction of this retirement system, and who establishes membership in a retirement system or a pension fund operated by such agency or agencies and who shall continue membership therein until attaining age sixty, shall remain a member for the exclusive purpose of receiving a retirement allowance without the limitation found in RCW 41.40.180(1) to begin on attainment of age sixty-five; however, such a member may on written notice to the director elect to receive a reduced retirement allowance on or after age sixty which allowance shall be the actuarial equivalent of the sum necessary to pay regular retirement benefits commencing at age sixty-five: PROVIDED, That if such member should withdraw all or part of the member's accumulated contributions except those additional contributions made pursuant to RCW 41.40.330(2), the individual shall thereupon cease to be a member and this section shall not apply.

[ 2002 c 62 s 1; 1997 c 254 s 12; 1994 c 197 s 26; 1992 195 s 1; 1990 c 249 s 17. Prior: 1987 c 384 s 1; 1987 c 88 s 1; 1986 c 317 s 3; 1983 c 233 s 2; 1982 1st ex.s. c 52 s 20; 1979 ex.s. c 249 s 10; 1974 ex.s. c 195 s 3; 1973 1st ex.s. c 190 s 6; 1969 c 128 s 6; 1967 c 127 s 4; 1965 c 155 s 3; 1963 c 174 s 8; 1955 c 277 s 3; 1953 c 200 s 7; 1951 c 50 s 3; 1949 c 240 s 10; 1947 c 274 s 16; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 11072-16.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Application—1997 c 254: See notes following RCW 41.26.490.

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 197: See notes following RCW 41.50.165.

Effective date—1992 c 195 s 1: "Section 1 of this act shall take effect January 1, 1994." [ 1992 c 195 s 3.]

Findings—1990 c 249: See note following RCW 2.10.146.

Effective dates—1987 c 384: "Section 1 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect on July 1, 1987. Section 2 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1988." [ 1987 c 384 s 3.]

Legislative findings—Intent—1986 c 317: "The legislature finds that in the past public employees and teachers who had terminated employment, withdrawn their retirement contributions, and subsequently returned to public employment or teaching either did not receive proper notification of the procedure to reinstate their withdrawn contributions or they did not fully understand the limitation on such reinstatement. In 1973, the legislature recognized this fact and provided an extraordinary reinstatement period for such employees. Further in 1983, the legislature established clear notification procedures for the proper notification of the reinstatement policy for all such returning employees. Therefore, it is the intent of this 1986 act to provide one last opportunity for reinstatement of withdrawn contributions to those who may have not been properly informed or misunderstood the reinstatement procedure." [ 1986 c 317 s 1.]

Severability—1986 c 317: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1986 c 317 s 11.]

Severability—1983 c 233: See note following RCW 41.32.500.

Effective dates—1982 1st ex.s. c 52: See note following RCW 2.10.180.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 195: See note following RCW 41.40.023.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 190: See note following RCW 41.40.010.

Severability—1969 c 128: See note following RCW 41.40.010.